Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3352.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws shall be amended by inserting the following new
section:-
Section 18AA. (a) The executive office of public safety and security, in collaboration
with the department of public health and the department of mental health, shall establish and
provide regulatory and administrative oversight to the behavioral health emergency response
pilot program, a co-response pilot program to increase the availability of behavioral health
clinicians to assist municipal police, fire and emergency medical professionals in emergency
response of 911 calls.
(b)(1) The program shall establish an application process for seeking a grant and
participating in the pilot program, criteria for municipal applicants, criteria for behavioral health
clinician staff, a process for determining approval for a grant application, and a data collection
system to understand outcomes of the co-response pilot program, including but not limited to the
of 3

number of individuals served, the demographics including age, gender, race, and ethnicity of
individuals served, the number and types of emergency calls, the number of emergency calls
requiring behavioral health clinician intervention, and behavioral health resources provided to
individuals served.
(b)(2) The program shall collaborate with a board of community-based behavioral health
organizations. The board shall include the executive director of the national alliance on mental
illness Massachusetts or a designee, the president of the association for behavioral healthcare or
a designee, the executive director of the Massachusetts chapter of the national association of
social workers or a designee, the director of greater Boston association of black social workers or
a designee, the director of the Massachusetts peer support network or a designee, the director of
the western Massachusetts learning community or designee, and the president of the
Massachusetts league of community health centers or a designee.
(d) Behavioral health clinician staff shall not respond to an emergency call without a
municipal police, fire or emergency medical professional.
(e) The program shall establish an educational program for municipal police, fire and
emergency medical professionals in the areas of behavioral health, community policing and
serving individuals with disabilities.
(f) The program shall report not later than 12 months after the effective date of this act
and annually thereafter to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint
committee on public health, and the joint committee on public safety and homeland security. The
report shall include but not be limited to an outline of grant allocation, the number of municipal
department participants, the number of behavioral health clinician staff, the data results of the
of 3

pilot program, identified barriers to establishing and maintaining the program and response
measures taken to promote public safety.
of 3